Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 54

Tennessee Sports Hall of Fame Act of 2019

4-3-5401. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Sports Hall of Fame Act of 2019.”

Acts 2019, ch. 88, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 54, §§4-3-5401 —4-3-5405 (Acts 1994, ch. 738, §§ 2-6; 2001, ch. 142, §§ 1, 2; 2006, ch. 822, §§ 1, 2; 2014, ch. 685, §§ 1,2; 2018, ch. 1056, §§ 1, 2) concerning the Tennessee Sports Hall of Fame Act of 1994, was repealed by Acts 2019, ch. 88, § 1 which enacted a new part 54, effective April 4, 2019.

4-3-5402. Part definitions.

As used in this part:

“Board” means the Tennessee hall of fame board created within the department under § 4-3-5404;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of tourist development, or the commissioner's designee;

“Department” means the department of tourist development; and

“Hall of fame” means the Tennessee sports hall of fame created under § 4-3-5403.

Acts 2019, ch. 88, § 1; 2020, ch. 699, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 54, §§4-3-5401 —4-3-5405 (Acts 1994, ch. 738, §§ 2-6; 2001, ch. 142, §§ 1, 2; 2006, ch. 822, §§ 1, 2; 2014, ch. 685, §§ 1,2; 2018, ch. 1056, §§ 1, 2) concerning the Tennessee Sports Hall of Fame Act of 1994, was repealed by Acts 2019, ch. 88, § 1 which enacted a new part 54, effective April 4, 2019.

4-3-5403. Creation and administration — Examination and audit.

There is created a Tennessee sports hall of fame.

The board shall administer the hall of fame, pursuant to § 4-3-5404.

The hall of fame is subject to examination and audit by the comptroller of the treasury in the same manner as prescribed for departments and agencies of the state pursuant to § 8-4-109.

Acts 2019, ch. 88, § 1; 2020, ch. 699, §§ 2, 3.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 54, §§4-3-5401 —4-3-5405 (Acts 1994, ch. 738, §§ 2-6; 2001, ch. 142, §§ 1, 2; 2006, ch. 822, §§ 1, 2; 2014, ch. 685, §§ 1,2; 2018, ch. 1056, §§ 1, 2) concerning the Tennessee Sports Hall of Fame Act of 1994, was repealed by Acts 2019, ch. 88, § 1 which enacted a new part 54, effective April 4, 2019.

The Tennessee sports hall of fame, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2022. See §§4-29-112,4-29-243.

4-3-5404. Existing board vacated — Creation of new board — Members — Term of office — Meetings — Executive director.

As of April 4, 2019:

The existing membership of the Tennessee sports hall of fame board of directors is vacated and the board ceases to exist; and

The position of executive director of the board of directors and any other position of employment with the board is vacated and those positions cease to exist.

There is created the Tennessee sports hall of fame board. For administrative purposes, the hall of fame is attached to the department. The board is composed of nineteen (19) voting members as follows:

Six (6) members each being appointed by the governor, the speaker of the senate, and the speaker of the house of representatives; and

The commissioner.

Each appointing authority shall appoint two (2) members from each grand division of this state, and when making future appointments, shall ensure that the grand divisions are equally represented.

In order to stagger the terms of the newly appointed board members:

The governor shall appoint six (6) persons to initial terms expiring on July 1, 2023;

The speaker of the senate shall appoint six (6) persons to initial terms expiring on July 1, 2022; and

The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint six (6) persons to initial terms expiring on July 1, 2021.

Following the initial terms, all appointed members of the board shall serve terms of four (4) years. A member shall not serve more than two (2) consecutive four-year terms.

Existing members of the Tennessee sports hall of fame board of directors, as of the day immediately preceding April 4, 2019, are not eligible for appointment to the board.

In the event of a vacancy for an appointed member of the board, the respective appointing authority shall fill the vacancy for the unexpired term. Each appointee shall serve until a successor is duly appointed and qualified.

The commissioner shall call the first meeting of the board after April 4, 2019. At the first meeting, and at the first meeting of each year thereafter, the board shall elect from among its members:

A chair, vice chair, and any other officers deemed necessary; and

An executive committee to be composed of seven (7) members, with two (2) members representing each grand division of this state, and the commissioner, who shall serve as chair of the executive committee.

The board shall meet at the call of the chair and not less than two (2) times per year.

The members of the board are not entitled to any compensation for their service on the board, nor are the members entitled to per diem or travel expenses for purposes of carrying out their duties under this part.

Meetings of the board must comply with the open meeting requirements of title 8, chapter 44.

All records of the board are deemed to be public records for purposes of the public records law, compiled in title 10, chapter 7.

The commissioner may appoint hall of fame personnel subject to the approval of the board. Nothing in this subsection (i) prohibits members from submitting recommendations to the commissioner for the appointment of hall of fame personnel. The hall of fame's personnel shall not be considered state employees for any purposes. The hall of fame's personnel are subject to an annual performance review by the commissioner, and upon completion of the review, the commissioner shall report the findings to the board.

[Deleted by 2020 amendment.]

Acts 2019, ch. 88, § 1; 2020, ch. 699, §§ 4-7.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 54, §§4-3-5401 —4-3-5405 (Acts 1994, ch. 738, §§ 2-6; 2001, ch. 142, §§ 1, 2; 2006, ch. 822, §§ 1, 2; 2014, ch. 685, §§ 1,2; 2018, ch. 1056, §§ 1, 2) concerning the Tennessee Sports Hall of Fame Act of 1994, was repealed by Acts 2019, ch. 88, § 1 which enacted a new part 54, effective April 4, 2019.

Acts 2019, ch. 88, § 2 provided that the Tennessee hall of fame board created within the department of tourist development under this section shall, within thirty (30) days of the last members appointment, reconsider, in whole or in part, the hall of fame classes elected for 2018 and 2019.

Cross-References. Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.

4-3-5405. Duties of board — Plan of operation.

The board shall:

Nominate and induct qualified athletes, athletic teams, sports personalities, and sporting events to the hall of fame in accordance with guidelines prescribed by the board, subject to approval by the commissioner;

Conduct fundraising to support the hall of fame. Any funds raised by the board must be used to support the hall of fame and held by the department and accounted for separately for such use;

Offer advice and guidance to the commissioner for purposes of the commissioner's administration of the hall of fame, including, but not limited to:

Suggesting programs and campaigns that are designated to promote the spirit of sportsmanship and genteel competition both inside and outside the arena of athletic competition; and

Recommending guidelines and criteria, consistent with the purposes of the hall of fame, for purposes of assisting the commissioner with the administration of a scholarship program under § 4-3-5407; and

For good cause shown, review, reconsider, and renominate, in whole or in part, a previous class elected to the hall of fame.

At least ninety (90) days prior to the beginning of each state fiscal year, the board shall submit a plan for operation to the commissioner for review and approval. The plan of operation must be in such form as the department requires and must include, but not be limited to, the following:

A budget for operating and capital expenditure;

Contracts for services; and

Policies and procedures adopted by the board to govern the expenditure of funds, including any such policies and procedures required by the department through rules.

The plan of operation may be amended during the fiscal year with the written approval of the commissioner.

Within ninety (90) days after the end of its fiscal year, the board shall annually submit to the department and comptroller of the treasury a report setting forth the board's accomplishments.

Acts 2019, ch. 88, § 1; 2020, ch. 699, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 54, §§4-3-5401 —4-3-5405 (Acts 1994, ch. 738, §§ 2-6; 2001, ch. 142, §§ 1, 2; 2006, ch. 822, §§ 1, 2; 2014, ch. 685, §§ 1,2; 2018, ch. 1056, §§ 1, 2) concerning the Tennessee Sports Hall of Fame Act of 1994, was repealed by Acts 2019, ch. 88, § 1 which enacted a new part 54, effective April 4, 2019.

4-3-5406. Purposes of the hall of fame — Commissioner facilitation.

In providing administrative support to the hall of fame, the commissioner shall facilitate the purposes of the hall of fame, which are to:

Honor, preserve, and perpetuate the names and accomplishments of outstanding athletes, athletic teams, and other sports personalities who are natives of Tennessee;

Honor persons who have competed on teams for, or worked for, Tennessee institutions of learning;

Honor persons with outstanding athletic records who reside in this state at the time of their nomination;

Honor deceased persons with outstanding athletic records who were residents of Tennessee;

Establish, erect, and maintain a permanent archive for the collection and display of memorabilia related to the lives and careers of individuals, teams, and sports events chosen for induction into the hall of fame; and

Inform the public about the lives and accomplishments of the inductees and purposes of the hall of fame.

The commissioner may delegate any duties under subsection (a) to the board as the commissioner deems necessary.

Acts 2019, ch. 88, § 1; 2020, ch. 699, § 9.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 54, §§4-3-5401 —4-3-5405 (Acts 1994, ch. 738, §§ 2-6; 2001, ch. 142, §§ 1, 2; 2006, ch. 822, §§ 1, 2; 2014, ch. 685, §§ 1,2; 2018, ch. 1056, §§ 1, 2) concerning the Tennessee Sports Hall of Fame Act of 1994, was repealed by Acts 2019, ch. 88, § 1 which enacted a new part 54, effective April 4, 2019.

4-3-5407. Powers of the commissioner.

The commissioner may:

Request from any branch, department, division, board, bureau, commission, or other agency of the state or that receives state funds, such information as will enable the commissioner and board to best serve the hall of fame and perform the duties required by this part;

Enter into any mutual agreements and contracts for the employment of personnel and operation of the hall of fame, excluding the requirements of § 4-3-1105. Nothing in this part or any other law, except title 9, chapter 8, shall be construed as a waiver of the state's immunity under the eleventh amendment to the Constitution of the United States or of the state's sovereign immunity for the board, its directors, officers, or employees;

Administer a scholarship program to award privately funded scholarships to students based on guidelines and criteria recommended by the board, consistent with the purposes of the hall of fame; and

Promulgate rules in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in chapter 5 of this title, for purposes of carrying out this part.

Acts 2019, ch. 88, § 1; 2020, ch. 699, § 10.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 54, §§4-3-5401 —4-3-5405 (Acts 1994, ch. 738, §§ 2-6; 2001, ch. 142, §§ 1, 2; 2006, ch. 822, §§ 1, 2; 2014, ch. 685, §§ 1,2; 2018, ch. 1056, §§ 1, 2) concerning the Tennessee Sports Hall of Fame Act of 1994, was repealed by Acts 2019, ch. 88, § 1 which enacted a new part 54, effective April 4, 2019.